Utah statutes.
62A-6-102.   Sterilization of persons 18 years of age or older.

(1)  It is lawful for a physician to sterilize a person who is 18 years of age or older and who has the capacity to give informed consent.

(2)  It is unlawful for a physician to sterilize a person who is 18 years of age or older and who is institutionalized, unless:

(a)  the physician, through careful examination and counseling, ensures that the person is capable of giving informed consent and that no undue influence or coercion to consent has been placed on that person by nature of the fact that he is institutionalized; or

(b)  the person is not capable of giving informed consent, a petition has been filed in accordance with Section 62A-6-107, and an order authorizing the sterilization has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(3)  It is unlawful for a physician to sterilize a person who is 18 years of age or older and who is not capable of giving informed consent unless a petition has been filed in accordance with Section 62A-6-107 and an order authorizing sterilization has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

